dictsource/ml_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Malayalam

// A means vowel letters (not vowel signs)
// B means a combining vowel sign or a virama

// change (k t. t p) to (g d. d b) if followed by a vowel, unless at start of a word or preceeded by an unvoiced stop consonant ??
.L01 _ ക്  ച്  ട്  ത്  പ്  


.replace
൦	0	// Convert Malayalam numbers
൧	1
൨	2
൩	3
൪	4
൫	5
൬	6
൭	7
൮	8
൯	9
ോ	ോ
ൊ	ൊ
ൌ	ൌ



.group ക
        ക്          k
        ക് (_       ky      // final virama is a short [ɨ]
   L01) ക          ka
   L01) ക (B       k
        ക          ga
        ക (B       g
        ക്ക          k:a
        ക്ക (B       k:

.group ഖ
        ഖ          k#a
        ഖ (B       k#

.group ഗ
        ഗ          ga
        ഗ (B       g

.group ഘ
        ഘ          g#a
        ഘ (B       g#

.group ങ
        ങ          Na
        ങ (B       N

.group ച
        ച          ca
        ച (B       c

.group ഛ
        ഛ          c#a
        ഛ (B       c#

.group ജ
        ജ          Ja
        ജ (B       J

.group ഝ
        ഝ          J#a
        ഝ (B       J#

.group ഞ
        ഞ          n^a
        ഞ (B       n^

.group ട
        ട്          t.
        ട് (_       t.y      // final virama is a short [ɨ]
   L01) ട          t.a
   L01) ട (B       t.
        ട          d.a
        ട (B       d.
        ട്ട          t.:a
        ട്ട (B       t.:

.group ഠ
        ഠ          t.#a
        ഠ (B       t.#

.group ഡ
        ഡ          d.a
        ഡ (B       d.

.group ഢ
        ഢ          d.#a
        ഢ (B       d.#

.group ണ
        ണ          n.a
        ണ (B       n.

.group ത
        ത്          t
        ത് (_       ty      // final virama is a short [ɨ]
   L01) ത          ta
   L01) ത (B       t
        ത          da
        ത (B       d
        ത്ത          t:a
        ത്ത (B       t:

.group ഥ
        ഥ          t#a
        ഥ (B       t#

.group ദ
        ദ          da
        ദ (B       d

.group ധ
        ധ          d#a
        ധ (B       d#

.group ന
        ന          na
        ന (B       n

.group പ
        പ്          p
        പ് (_       py      // final virama is a short [ɨ]
   L01) പ          pa
   L01) പ (B       p
        പ          ba
        പ (B       b
        പ്പ          p:a
        പ്പ (B       p:

.group ഫ
        ഫ          p#a
        ഫ (B       p#

 _പ്രൊ) ഫ (സര്     fa


.group ബ
        ബ          ba
        ബ (B       b

.group ഭ
        ഭ          b#a
        ഭ (B       b#

.group മ
        മ          ma
        മ (B       m

.group യ
        യ          ja
        യ (B       j

.group ര
        ര          ra
        ര (B       r

.group റ
        റ          R2a
        റ (B       R2
    ന്) റ          d2
        റ്റ        t.t.      // ?? R2R2 = t.t.

.group ല
        ല          la
        ല (B       l

.group ള
        ള          l.a
        ള (B       l.

.group ഴ    // retroflex approximant [ɻ]
        ഴ          z.a
        ഴ (B       z.

.group വ
        വ          va
        വ (B       v

.group ശ
        ശ          S;a
        ശ (B       S;

.group ഷ
        ഷ          s.a
        ഷ (B       s.

.group സ
        സ          sa
        സ (B       s

.group ഹ
        ഹ          ha
        ഹ (B       h


// chillu consonants
.group ൺ
        ൺ          n.

.group ൻ
        ൻ          n

.group ർ
        ർ          r

.group ൽ
        ൽ          l

.group ൾ
        ൾ          l.

.group ൿ
        ൿ          k


.group 0xe0b4   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b4]

        ഽ                    // avagraha

        ം          m         // anusvara (this should nasalize the vowel)

        ഃ          h         // visarga

        അ          a

        ആ          a:

        ഇ          i

        ഈ          i:

        ഉ          u

        ഊ          u:

        ഋ          Ry

        എ          e
     _) എ          ;e

        ഏ          e:
     _) ഏ          ;e:

        ഐ          aI

        ഒ          o

        ഓ          o:

        ഔ          aU

// combining vowel signs

        ാ          a:

        ി          i
        ി (ല്K     I

.group 0xe0b5   // characters which start with UTF-8 bytes: [e0 b5]

        ീ          i:

        ു          u

        ൂ          u:

        ൃ          r-

        ൄ          r-:

        െ          e

        േ          e:

        ൈ          aI

        ൊ          o

        ോ          o:

        ൌ          aU
        ൗ          aU        // au length mark, treat at [aU] ?

        ്                    // virama
        ൎ                    // chillu-virama (unofficial)
        ്്                   // espeak uses double-virama for "virama + U+200d" (zero-width joiner), to indicate a chillu character
        ് (_       y         //   epenthetic vowel at end of word

        ൠ          Ry:

        ൡ          ly:



.group
        $          do:l.ar
